Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-15,155
Loans to municipalities or counties; conditions.

(1) All loans made under the Wastewater Treatment Facilities Construction Assistance Act shall be made only to municipalities or to counties that:

(a) Meet the requirements of financial capability set by the department;

(b) Pledge sufficient revenue sources for the repayment of the loan if such revenue may by law be pledged for that purpose;

(c) Agree to maintain financial records according to generally accepted government accounting standards and to conduct an audit of the project's financial records;

(d) Provide a written assurance, signed by an attorney, that the municipality or county has proper title, easements, and rights-of-way to the property on or through which the wastewater treatment works or nonpoint source control systems is to be constructed or extended;

(e) Require the contractor of the construction project to post separate performance and payment bonds or other security approved by the department in the amount of the bid;

(f) Provide a written notice of completion and start of operation of the facility; and

(g) Employ a professional engineer to provide and be responsible for engineering services on the project such as an engineering report, construction contract documents, observation of construction, and startup services.

(2) Loans made under the act for the construction, rehabilitation, operation, and maintenance of wastewater treatment works shall be made only to municipalities or to counties which meet the conditions of subsection (1) of this section and, in addition, that:

(a) Develop and implement a long-term wastewater treatment works management plan for the term of the loan, including yearly renewals;

(b) Provide capacity for twenty years domestic and industrial growth or reasonable capacity as determined by the department;

(c) Agree to operate and maintain the wastewater treatment works so that it will function properly over the structural and material design life which shall not be less than twenty years; and

(d) Provide a certified operator pursuant to voluntary or mandatory certification program, whichever is in effect.

Laws 1988, LB 766, § 9;

Laws 1994, LB 1139, § 44;

Laws 1996, LB 1226, § 28;

Laws 1997, LB 622, § 125.